Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.39
Subdivision real estate; cease and desist orders.

The director, with the consent of the commission, shall have the power to issue a cease and desist order upon determination that sections 81-885.33 to 81-885.38 have been or are about to be violated.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 39.